Massachusetts, session 194th, S148.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
1  SECTION 1. Clause (22) of subsection (a) of section 172 of chapter 6 of the General 
2 Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out, in line 133, 
3 the words “2A of chapter 38” and inserting in place thereof the following words: “15 of chapter 
4 18C.”  
5  SECTION 2. Section 6A of chapter 18B of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby 
6 amended by striking out the fifth paragraph.  
7  SECTION 3. Section 7 of said chapter 18B, as so appearing, is hereby amended by 
8 striking out subsection (e).  

2 of 41 9  SECTION 4. Chapter 18B of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby amended by 
10 inserting after section 6A the following subsection:-  
11  (b) the department of elementary and secondary education, in consultation with the 
12 department children and families, shall establish and promulgate clear timelines for the 
13 enrollment of a child in the department of children and families’ custody to a new school district, 
14 including but not limited to, the timely transfer of relevant records and documentation. 
15  SECTION 5. Section 20 of said chapter 18B, as so appearing, is hereby amended by 
16 striking out the second sentence.  
17  SECTION 6. Section 23 of said chapter 18B, inserted by section 45 of chapter 176 of the 
18 acts of 2008, is hereby repealed.  
19  SECTION 7. Section 23 of said chapter 18B, inserted by section 8 of chapter 321 of the 
20 acts of 2008, is hereby amended by striking out the sixth sentence.  
21  SECTION 8. Sections 24 and 25 of said chapter 18B are hereby repealed.  
22  SECTION 9. Said chapter 18B is hereby further amended by adding the following 2 
23 sections:-  
24  Section 26. (a) For the purposes of this section, the term “legislatively mandated report” 
25 shall mean a report required by law of the department of children and families.   
26  (b) (1) Annually, not later than October 31, the department shall issue a report that 
27 provides an overview of the department’s performance during the previous fiscal year. The 
28 commissioner or a designee shall file the report with the governor, the child advocate, the clerks 
29 of the senate and house of representatives, the house and senate committees on ways and means 

3 of 41 30 and the joint committee on children, families and persons with disabilities. The commissioner 
31 shall provide the recipients of the report with an opportunity to discuss its contents with the 
32 commissioner or designee. The report shall be made publicly available on the department’s 
33 website in accordance with section 19 of chapter 66.  
34  (2) The report shall include, but not be limited to, narratives, information, data and 
35 analysis on: (i) counts, including but not limited to: (A) case counts; (B) consumer counts; (C) 
36 consumer demographic information, including age, race, ethnicity, primary language, birth sex, 
37 gender identity, sexual orientation and disability; (D) the number of consumers who have slept in 
38 temporary locations by region, the average length of stay, and any system wide challenges for 
39 finding placement (E) intersectional data; (F) rates of racial disproportionality and disparity at 
40 various decision points throughout the life of a case, including but not limited to; (1) protective 
41 intakes and responses: (2) consumer children 0-17 years of age with an open case as compared to 
42 the proportion of the child population in Massachusetts; (3) the number of children and youth in 
43 placement by placement type; (4) permanency plans for children and youth in placement, 
44 including plans meeting the federal permanency standard; (5) permanency outcome as compared 
45 to children in placement; (6) the median placement length of stay in days for children who exited 
46 care as well as for children who were in out-of-home care; (7) placement moves per 1,000 
47 placement days for children who entered care during the specified fiscal year; (8) exits from care 
48 to reunification, adoption and guardianship as a rate of all exits from placement; (9) youth aging 
49 out as a rate of all exits from placement; (G) the approximate number of requests for reasonable 
50 accommodations; (H) the number of disability related complaints filed with the department; (I) 
51 reports filed pursuant to section 51A of chapter 119; (I) placement metrics including but not 
52 limited to (1) placement moves per 1,000 placement days for children who entered care during 

4 of 41 53 the specified fiscal year; (2) initial placement with kin; (3) the median number of placements 
54 between a home removal episode and an initial placement review; (J) infants brought into the 
55 department’s care pursuant to section 39½ of chapter 119; (K) siblings in placement; (ii) 
56 processes and outcomes including, but not limited to: (A) protective responses and safety 
57 outcomes; (B) the number of fatalities including the manner of death and fatalities by family 
58 history with the department; (C) permanency processes and outcomes, including, but not limited 
59 to, reunification, adoption, guardianship, kinship adoption, kinship guardianship and aging out; 
60 (D) well-being outcomes, including the rates and timeliness of the delivery of medical and 
61 behavioral health services; (E) educational well-being outcomes, including but not limited to: (1) 
62 school placement information; (2) the number of Individualized Education Plans; (3) attendance 
63 rates; (4) high school graduation rates and (5) school disciplinary actions; and (iii) operations, 
64 including but not limited to: (A) staffing trends; (B) caseloads; (C) the department’s budget, 
65 including funding levels; (D) service costs, including but not limited to, departmental foster care, 
66 contracted foster care, complex medical foster care, congregate care, adoption and guardianship 
67 subsidies, foster care support services, respite and support and stabilization; (E) medical services 
68 and advancements in providing medical services to children and young adults in the 
69 department’s care; (F) the number of children and young adults in the department’s care in 
70 emergency departments, inpatient units, psychiatric hospitals, or community-based acute 
71 treatment programs who are awaiting alternate placements and the average duration of days 
72 waiting; (G) cost resources and practices, to reduce overrepresentation of children and youth of 
73 minority populations in the child welfare system due to over reporting; and (J) any new or 
74 ongoing initiatives to improve practices, procedures and policy of the department. The 
75 department may provide additional narrative pursuant to health, mental health, disability and 

5 of 41 76 disproportionality related metrics where numerical metrics are not available. (K) The 
77 commissioner or designee, shall submit a report to the office of the child advocate, house and 
78 senate committees on ways and means, the joint committee on children, families and persons 
79 with disabilities, and the house and senate clerks’ offices on the number and types of complaints 
80 or alleged violation received pursuant to the Foster Child Bill of Rights, section 30 of this Act. 
81 This report shall follow the filing requirements of subsection (b).  
82   The report shall also include comparative departmental information from prior fiscal 
83 years.   
84  (c)(1) Quarterly, not more than 45 days after the end of each fiscal quarter, the 
85 department shall issue a quarterly profile on its website in accordance with section 19 of chapter 
86 66 that shall include, but not be limited to, departmental, regional office and area office data on: 
87 (i) consumer counts; (ii) the number of reports filed pursuant to section 51A of chapter 119, 
88 including but not limited to counts of reports received, screened-in and screened-out in total and 
89 by reporter role; (iii) rates and recurrence of maltreatment; (iv) department case counts, including 
90 counts of clinical and adoption cases; (v) consumer demographic information, including age, 
91 race, ethnicity, primary language, birth sex, gender identity and sexual orientation and disability; 
92 (vi) counts of children and youth in placement by type of placement; (vii) counts of children and 
93 youth not in placement.  
94  (2) The commissioner or designee shall notify the house and senate committees on ways 
95 and means and the joint committee on children, families and persons with disabilities when data 
96 from a profile issued pursuant to paragraph (1) significantly departs from trends reported in 
97 previous profiles.  

6 of 41 98  (d) The commissioner or designee shall notify the joint committee on children, families 
99 and persons with disabilities within one week of a consumer in the department’s custody 
100 sleeping in the department’s area office overnight by region including the average length of stay, 
101 the consumers’ ages, previous placement type and challenge for finding placement.  
102  (e) Annually, not later than October 31, the department shall file a special report on 
103 services provided to young adults over the age of 18 with the child advocate, the clerks of the 
104 senate and house of representatives, the house and senate committees on ways and means and the 
105 joint committee on children, families and persons with disabilities. The report shall summarize 
106 the process by which a young adult may continue to receive services from the department upon 
107 reaching the legal adult age of 18. The report shall also include but not be limited to consumer 
108 demographic information detailing age, race, ethnicity, primary language, gender identity, sexual 
109 orientation, disability and rates of racial disproportionality and disparity but not be limited to: (i) 
110 the number of young adults who have elected to sustain or reestablish a connection with the 
111 department in the previous fiscal year; and (ii) the number of young adults who have elected not 
112 to remain with the department and have transitioned out of the child welfare system in the 
113 previous fiscal year, including young adults who had previously elected to sustain a connection 
114 with the department, if such numbers are available, (iii) the number of transition age youth aging 
115 out with: (1) stable and permanent housing; (2) employment (full or part-time) or military 
116 enlistment; (3) health insurance; (4) if sought, post-secondary education such as college, job 
117 training or certificate program within six (6) months. The department may satisfy the reporting 
118 requirements of this section by providing the requested information in an annual report filed 
119 under subsection (b) of this section.   

7 of 41 120  (e) Section 28. Annually, not later than October 31, the department shall file a special 
121 report on its fair hearing processes and cases with the child advocate, the clerks of the senate and 
122 house of representatives, the house and senate committees on ways and means and the joint 
123 committee on children, families and persons with disabilities. The department may satisfy the 
124 reporting requirement of this section by providing the requested information in an annual report 
125 filed under section 26. The report shall be made available to the public electronically in 
126 accordance with section 19 of chapter 66. The report shall include, but not be limited to, 
127 information in a form that shall not include personally identifiable information on the fair 
128 hearing requests open at any time during the previous fiscal year and, for each hearing request, 
129 shall provide: (i) the subject matter of the appeal; (ii) the outcomes of cases resolved prior to a 
130 fair hearing decision; (iii) the number of days between the hearing request and the first day of the 
131 hearing; (iv) the number of days between the close of the evidence and the hearing officer’s 
132 decision; (v) the number of days of continuance granted at the appellant’s request; (vi) the 
133 number of days of continuance granted at the request of the department or the hearing officer, 
134 specifying which party made the request; and (vii) whether the department’s decision that was 
135 the subject of the appeal was affirmed or reversed.  
136  The department shall maintain and make available to the public during regular business 
137 hours, a record of its fair hearings in a form that shall not include personally identifiable 
138 information and that shall include, for each hearing request: (i) the date of the request; (ii) the 
139 date of the hearing decision; (iii) the decision rendered by the hearing officer; and (iv) the final 
140 decision rendered upon the commissioner’s review. For fair hearing requests that are pending for 
141 more than 180 days at any time during the fiscal year, except for those requests which have been 
142 stayed at the request of the district attorney, the report shall provide the number of such cases, 

8 of 41 143 how many of those cases have been heard but not decided and how many have been decided by 
144 the hearing officer but not yet issued a final agency decision.  
145  If there are more than 225 fair hearing requests open for more than 180 days at the close 
146 of any month during the first 6 months of a fiscal year, then an additional report of such requests 
147 shall be provided not later than April 30. The department shall make redacted copies of fair 
148 hearing decisions available not later than 30 days after a written request.  
149  (f) Annually, not later than October 31, the department shall file a special report on the 
150 foster care review system and any recommendations for its improvement, with the child 
151 advocate, the clerks of the senate and house of representatives, the house and senate committees 
152 on ways and means and the joint committee on children, families and persons with disabilities. 
153 The report shall be made available to the public electronically in accordance with section 19 of 
154 chapter 66. The report shall include, but not be limited to: (1) the department served population, 
155 including but not limited to case counts, child/youth/young adult and parent/caregiver counts and 
156 children/youth/young adults in placement; (2) a foster care review overview, including but not 
157 limited to foster care review policy, numbers of children/youth/young adults in placement with a 
158 convened foster care review and foster care review considerations; (3) scheduling, including but 
159 not limited to scheduled and convened foster care review meetings, children/youth/young adults 
160 reviewed, duration of meetings and timeliness of foster care review report completion; (4) 
161 attendance, including but not limited to foster care review meeting panel composition and 
162 mandated participants invited and attended; (5) the review process, including but not limited to 
163 the department action plan; placement activities; social worker contact; parent-child visitation; 
164 health, education and well-being needs; information on youth/young adults and systemic barriers 
165 for children/youth/young adults and parents/caregivers; (6) foster care review determinations; (7) 

9 of 41 166 minority opinions, including but not limited to minority opinions by panel member and (8) foster 
167 care review follow-up activities. The department may satisfy the reporting requirements of this 
168 section by providing the requested information in an annual report filed under subsection (b) of 
169 this section.  
170  (g) Annually, not later than October 31st, the department shall file a special report on the 
171 foster care review system and any recommendations for its improvement, with the child 
172 advocate, the clerks of the senate and house of representatives, the house and senate committees 
173 on ways and means and the joint committee on children, families and persons with disabilities. 
174 including but not limited to: (1) the department served population, including but not limited to 
175 case counts, child/youth/young adult and parent/caregiver counts and children/youth/young 
176 adults in placement; (2) a foster care review overview, including but not limited to foster care 
177 review policy, numbers of children/youth/young adults in placement with a convened foster care 
178 review and foster care review considerations; (3) scheduling, including but not limited to 
179 scheduled and convened foster care review meetings, children/youth/young adults reviewed, 
180 duration of meetings and timeliness of foster care review report completion; (4) attendance, 
181 including but not limited to foster care review meeting panel composition and mandated 
182 participants invited and attended; (5) the review process, including but not limited to the 
183 department action plan; placement activities; social worker contact; parent-child visitation; 
184 health, education and well-being needs; information on youth/young adults and systemic barriers 
185 for children/youth/young adults and parents/caregivers; (6) foster care review determinations; (7) 
186 minority opinions, including but not limited to minority opinions by panel member and (8) foster 
187 care review follow-up activities;  

10 of 41 188  (h) The commissioner or designee shall notify the joint committee on children, families 
189 and persons with disabilities when draft regulations are made available by the department for 
190 public comment. Not more than 30 days after the promulgation of regulations or the effective 
191 date of adopted or revised departmental policies relative to services provided to children and 
192 families, the department shall provide copies of the regulations or departmental policies to the 
193 joint committee on children, families and persons with disabilities.  
194  (i) If the department is unable to submit the report under subsection (b), issue the profile 
195 under subsection (i) or any other legislatively mandated reports by the respective deadlines, the 
196 commissioner or the commissioner’s legal counsel shall  notify the governor, the child advocate, 
197 the clerks of the senate and house of representatives, the house and senate committees on ways 
198 and means and the joint committee on children, families and persons with disabilities in writing 
199 and provide an explanation for the delay.   
200  (j) The department may satisfy the reporting requirements of this section by providing the 
201 requested information in an annual report as required under chapter 18B.   
202  Section 27. The department, in consultation with the general court, other governmental 
203 and nongovernmental partners, shall establish a 5-year plan that shall include numerical targets 
204 for the department’s performance in each year and in each of its regions in the areas of safety, 
205 permanence and well-being. The plan shall include a description of how the department will 
206 measure its progress toward meeting the numerical targets and may include different targets for 
207 different regions. The department shall update the plan annually.  
208  Annually, the department shall measure its performance in meeting the targets established 
209 in the 5-year plan for the commonwealth as a whole and for each of its regions consistent with 

11 of 41 210 the methodology described in the plan. The department shall publish and maintain on its website 
211 the current plan, the targets for previous years and the department’s performance in meeting 
212 those targets.   
213  If in a fiscal year the department is unable to develop or update the 5-year plan or 
214 measure its performance, the department shall notify the clerks of the house or representatives 
215 and senate, the house and senate committees on ways and means, the joint committee on 
216 children, families and persons with disabilities and the child advocate.   
217  SECTION 10. Section 1 of chapter 18C of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby 
218 amended by striking out the definition of “Advisory council”.  
219  SECTION 11. Section 1 of said chapter 18C, as so appearing, is hereby amended by 
220 striking out the definition of “Critical Incident” and inserting in place thereof the following 
221 words:- (i) a fatality, near fatality, or serious bodily, or emotional injury, of a child, or the 
222 indecent assault and battery of a child in accordance with M.G.L. c. 265 §§ 13B- 13B ¾ and §§ 
223 23-23B, who is in the custody of or receiving services from an executive agency or a constituent 
224 agency; or (ii) circumstances which result in a reasonable belief that an executive agency or a 
225 constituent agency failed in its duty to protect or adequately serve a child and, as a result, the 
226 child was at imminent risk of, or suffered serious bodily or emotional injury or death. 
227  SECTION 12. Section 1 of said chapter 18C, as so appearing, is hereby amended by 
228 adding the following definition:- “Emotional Injury”, occurs when a child of any age witnesses 
229 the fatality or life-threatening incident of an individual related to an unexpected medical event, 
230 overdose, violent act, or suicide. 

12 of 41 231  SECTION 13. Section 1 of said chapter 18C, as so appearing, is hereby amended by 
232 striking out, in line 15, the word “including” and inserting in place thereof the following words:- 
233 that provides services to children, including services through contracted providers and through 
234 entities licensed by the state agency.  Executive agencies include 
235  SECTION 14. Section 1 of said chapter 18C, as so appearing, is hereby amended by 
236 adding the following definition:- “Near fatality”, is an injury that is accidental, the result of a 
237 medical condition, or the result of abuse and neglect and is dependent on verbal certification by a 
238 physician that the child’s condition is considered to be life threatening. 
239  SECTION 15. Section 1 of said chapter 18C, as so appearing, is hereby amended by 
240 striking out, in line 21, the words “or emotional”.  
241  SECTION 16. Section 2 of said chapter 18C, as so appearing, is hereby amended by 
242 striking out, in lines 2 and 3, the words “shall be independent of any supervision or control by 
243 any executive agency” and inserting in place thereof the following words:- shall be an 
244 independent state agency, whose function is to oversee the service executive agencies provide to 
245 children, not subject to the supervision and control of any other executive office, department, 
246 commission, board, bureau, agency or political subdivision of the commonwealth.  
247  SECTION 17. Said section 2 of said chapter 18C, as so appearing, is hereby further 
248 amended by striking out subsection (c) and inserting in place thereof the following words:- (c) 
249 examine, on a system-wide and individual case basis, the care and services that executive 
250 agencies, particularly the Department of Children and Families, the Department of Youth 
251 Services, the Department of Public Health, the Department of Mental Health, the Department of 
252 Developmental Services, the Department of Early Education and Care, and the Department of 

13 of 41 253 Elementary and Secondary Education, provide to children through direct services, guidance and 
254 oversight, contracted services and licensing functions; 
255  SECTION 18. Said section 2 of said chapter 18C, as so appearing, is hereby further 
256 amended by striking out, in line 17, the second time it appears, the word “and”.   
257  SECTION 19. Said section 2 of said chapter 18C, as so appearing, is hereby further 
258 amended by striking out subsection (e) and inserting in place thereof the following subsection:- 
259 (e) examine disproportionality related to topics including, but not limited to, race, ethnicity, 
260 disability status, transgender status, sexual orientation or gender identity within child state 
261 systems, services and agencies.  
262  SECTION 20. Said section 2 of said chapter 18C, as so appearing, is hereby further 
263 amended by adding the following subsection:- (f) partner with executive agencies or other 
264 entities to support pilot programs and expand or improve current programs when, in the child 
265 advocate’s sole discretion, the child advocate determines that such partnership does not 
266 jeopardize the office’s oversight functions and the child advocate determines that such 
267 partnership is in the best interest of the children of the Commonwealth; and 
268  SECTION 21. Said section 2 of said chapter 18C, as so appearing, is hereby further 
269 amended by adding the following subsection:- (g) provide training and technical assistance to 
270 executive agencies to improve services to children when, in the child advocate’s sole discretion, 
271 the child advocate determines that such training and technical assistance does not jeopardize the 
272 office’s oversight functions and the child advocate determines that such training and technical 
273 assistance is in the best interest of the children of the Commonwealth. 

14 of 41 274  SECTION 22. Said section 2 of said chapter 18C is hereby further amended by striking 
275 out, in line 20, the word “services.” and inserting in place thereof the following words:- 
276 “services; and”.   
277  SECTION 23. Said section 2 of said chapter 18C, as so appearing, is hereby further 
278 amended by adding the following 4 paragraphs:-   
279  The office shall create and maintain a website that makes available mandated reporter 
280 trainings, guidance, statutory reference and best practices materials in 1 online location to all 
281 mandated reporters in the commonwealth. The website shall also contain a list of available 
282 resources for families who need support and guidance on how mandated reporters can connect 
283 individuals or families to those resources. The office shall consult with, or partner with, any 
284 public or private entity that the child advocate deems relevant to create and maintain this 
285 website. The office shall be responsible for ensuring that information on the website remains 
286 current. The office shall collect data on how many individuals access the website. The website 
287 shall be made available to the public within one year of the effective date of this legislation.  
288  The office shall create and make available to the public, on the website created in this 
289 section, evidence-based mandated reporter training for all mandated reporters in the 
290 commonwealth. The training shall include, but is not limited to, training in child abuse and 
291 neglect reporting, technical instruction on how to file a 51A report and details on the 
292 department’s process regarding the filing and treatment of 51A reports, and should address bias 
293 in mandated reporting. Training shall aim to improve the quality of reporting and discourage 
294 reports that do not rise to the relevant statutory standard, including, but not limited to, 
295 information on how to address concerns with families and children when those concerns do not 

15 of 41 296 rise to the level of requiring a maltreatment report, information about connecting families with 
297 needed supports and resources and how to understand what qualifies as neglect.  
298  The office may, as appropriate, expand, update or amend mandated reporter training. The 
299 office may create additional evidence-based mandated reporter trainings for specific groups of 
300 individuals such as educators, childcare workers, social workers and foster parents. The office of 
301 the child advocate may consult, or partner with, any public or private entity that the child 
302 advocate deems relevant to create, update, expand, implement or amend any mandated reporter 
303 trainings the office creates. As needed, the office shall solicit feedback on mandated reporter 
304 training from mandated reporters who have participated in the training created by the office.   
305  The office must include on their website a method that is accessible after the training has 
306 been completed by which members of the public can submit feedback on the training at any point 
307 in time.  Further, the office must include in its annual report data on the use and effectiveness of 
308 the training and the feedback that was collected from the individuals who took the training.  
309  SECTION 24. Section 3 of said chapter 18C, as appearing in the 2020 Official Edition, is 
310 hereby amended by inserting after the word “health”, in line 10, the following words:- “; the 
311 speaker of the house of representatives, or designee; the senate president, or designee; the house 
312 minority leader, or designee; the senate minority leader, or designee; a person with experience in 
313 the child welfare system to be designated by the Massachusetts Network of Foster Care Alumni; 
314 a person with experience as a foster parent to be designated by the Massachusetts Alliance for 
315 Families”.  

16 of 41 316  SECTION 25. Section 3 of said chapter 18C, as so appearing, is hereby amended by 
317 striking out, in lines 10 and 11, the words “child abuse prevention board” and inserting in place 
318 thereof the following words:- Children’s Trust 
319  SECTION 26. The fourth paragraph of said section 3 of said chapter 18C, as so 
320 appearing, is hereby further amended by adding the following sentence:- “The child advocate’s 
321 annual salary shall be 80 90 percent of the salary of the chief justice of the supreme judicial 
322 court.”  
323  SECTION 27. Said chapter 18C is hereby further amended by striking out section 4 and 
324 inserting in place thereof the following section:-  
325  “Section 4. Child advocate advisory board.  
326  The child advocate shall meet with the governor, the speaker of the house of 
327 representatives, the senate president, the attorney general, the state auditor, the chief justice of 
328 the trial court, and the chief justice of the juvenile court at least annually and shall present the 
329 annual goals of the office set by the child advocate and its plans for monitoring the work, 
330 including the continuous quality improvement, of executive agencies and the identification of 
331 any critical gaps and issues relating to interagency collaboration.”  
332  SECTION 28. Section 5 of said chapter 18C, as so appearing, is hereby amended in 
333 subsection (a), in line 2, by inserting after the word “occurred” the following words:- 
334 Notification shall include the demographic information of the child, if known.  

17 of 41 335  SECTION 29. Section 5 of said chapter 18C, as so appearing, is hereby amended in 
336 subsection (a), by striking out the word “he” and inserting in place thereof the following word, in 
337 each instance, in said section:- they 
338  SECTION 30. Section 5 of said chapter 18C, as so appearing, is hereby amended in 
339 subsection (a) by striking out the word “his” and inserting in place thereof the following word, in 
340 each instance, in said section:- their 
341  SECTION 31. Section 5 of said chapter 18C, as so appearing, is hereby amended in 
342 subsection (b), in line 18, by striking out the word “he” and interesting in place thereof the 
343 following word,:- they 
344  SECTION 32. Section 5 of said chapter 18C, as so appearing, is hereby amended in 
345 subsection (b), in lines 16, 19, and 21 by striking out the word “his” and inserting in place 
346 thereof the following word:- their 
347  SECTION 33. Section 5 of said chapter 18C, as so appearing, is hereby amended in 
348 subsection (b), in line 25, by striking out the word “his” and inserting in place thereof the 
349 following words:- the office’s 
350  SECTION 34. Section 5 of said chapter 18C, as so appearing, is hereby amended in 
351 subsection (c), in line 28, by striking out the word “him” and inserting in place thereof the 
352 following words:- the child advocate 
353  SECTION 35. Section 5 of said chapter 18C, as so appearing, is hereby amended by 
354 adding the following subsection:-  

18 of 41 355  “(i) The child advocate shall notify the governor, the attorney general, the auditor, the 
356 speaker of the house of representatives and the senate president when conducting an 
357 investigation which the Child Advocate plans to release publicly due to a reasonable belief that 
358 an executive agency or constituent agency failed in its duty to protect or adequately serve a child. 
359 In order to ensure the integrity and independence of the office, the governor, the attorney 
360 general, the auditor, the speaker of the house of representatives and the senate president shall 
361 receive the final full report of such an investigation before any executive office, agency or 
362 program that is the subject of said investigation.”  
363  SECTION 36. Section 5 of said chapter 18C, as so appearing, is hereby amended by 
364 adding the following subsection:- 
365  (j) The department shall inform the child advocate as soon as practicable when a foster 
366 care review safety alert is issued.  The office shall review the circumstances of that foster care 
367 review safety alert and provide feedback to the department on individual cases and trends in 
368 services. 
369  SECTION 37. Section 6 of said chapter 18C, as so appearing, is hereby amended by 
370 striking out the word “his” and inserting in place thereof the following word:- their 
371  SECTION 38. Section 6 of said chapter 18C, as so appearing, is hereby amended by 
372 inserting, in line 8, after the words “access to” the following words:- all court records that the 
373 child advocate deems 
374  SECTION 39. Section 6 of said chapter 18C, as so appearing, is hereby amended by 
375 inserting, in line 8, after the word “relevant” the following word:- including  

19 of 41 376  SECTION 40. Section 6 of said chapter 18C, as so appearing, is hereby amended by 
377 inserting, in line 10, after the word “court” following words:- records held by the Massachusetts 
378 Probation Service, and records on adults and juveniles contained in the electronic information 
379 systems maintained by the department of criminal justice information services, including 
380 personally identifiable information if requested by the child advocate 
381  SECTION 41. Section 6 of said chapter 18C, as so appearing, is hereby amended by 
382 adding the following sentence:- “The child advocate is entitled to obtain from the clerks of the 
383 juvenile court or probate and family court information on the dates and the title or summary of 
384 what occurred on these dates showing the progression of an active court case to which the 
385 department is a party as well as notification of future court dates for a given case upon request.”  
386  SECTION 42. Section 9 of said chapter 18C, as so appearing, is hereby amended by 
387 striking out the word “his” and inserting in place thereof the following word:- their 
388  SECTION 43. Section 10 of said chapter 18C, as so appearing, is hereby amended by 
389 inserting after the number “5” in line 7 the following words:- “,data described in section 2 of this 
390 chapter related to the mandated reporter training and website”.  
391  SECTION 44. Section 11 of said chapter 18C, as so appearing, is hereby amended by 
392 striking out section 11 in its entirety, and inserting in place thereof the following section:-  
393  Section 11. Examination of systemwide services  
394  The child advocate, in their independent role or in their role as chair of the Juvenile 
395 Justice Policy and Data Board, may examine systemwide challenges to the provision of adequate 
396 services to children. The child advocate may prioritize challenges that include multiple state 

20 of 41 397 agencies or secretariats and challenges that affect the most vulnerable children. Such systemwide 
398 examinations will include recommendations for improvements to the state system of services for 
399 children. The child advocate may utilize any source of information available to the office to 
400 make recommendations and may seek advice from individuals with expertise in relevant fields of 
401 work or study in preparing a report under this section. The child advocate shall file a report on 
402 any such examination with the governor, the clerks of the senate and house of representatives, 
403 the senate and house committees on ways and means, the joint committee on children, families 
404 and persons with disabilities, and shall report on any such examination in the annual report 
405 pursuant to section 10. 
406  SECTION 45. Section 12 of said chapter 18C, as so appearing, is hereby amended, in 
407 subsection (a), in line 3, by inserting after the word “Notwithstanding” the following words:- 
408 sections 167 and 172 of chapter 6, 
409  SECTION 46. Section 12 of said chapter 18C, as so appearing, is hereby amended, in 
410 subsection (a), in line 12, by striking out the word “his” and inserting in place thereof the 
411 following word:- their 
412  SECTION 47. Section 12 of said chapter 18C, as so appearing, is hereby amended, in 
413 subsection (b), in line 21, by inserting after the number “4” the following words:- and under 
414 chapter 66A 
415  SECTION 48. Section 12 of said chapter 18C, as so appearing, is hereby amended, in 
416 subsection (c), in line 23, by striking out the word “his” and inserting in place thereof the 
417 following word:- the  

21 of 41 418  SECTION 49. Section 12 of said chapter 18C, as so appearing, is hereby amended by 
419 inserting, in line 36, after the word “personnel,” the following words:- the speaker of the house 
420 of representatives, the senate president.  
421  SECTION 50. Section 12 of chapter 18C, as so appearing, is hereby amended, in 
422 subsection (e), by inserting the following subsections:-  
423  (ii) the child advocate from sharing information with a state agency when the child 
424 advocate deems, in their sole discretion, that such information sharing is necessary for the child 
425 advocate to perform the child advocate’s duties. 
426  (iii) the child advocate from issuing a public report when such report, in the sole 
427 discretion of the child advocate, is necessary for the child advocate to perform the child 
428 advocate’s duties. 
429  SECTION 51. Section 13 of chapter 18C, as so appearing, is hereby amended, in line X, 
430 by striking out the word “his” and replacing it therefore with the following word:- their  
431  SECTION 52. Chapter 18C of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2020 Official 
432 Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after section 14 the following section:  
433  Section 15: (a) As used in this section the following words shall, unless the context 
434 clearly requires otherwise, have the following meanings:  
435  “Child”, a person under the age of 18.  
436  “Fatality”, a death of a child.  
437  “Local team”, a local child fatality review team established in subsection (c).  

22 of 41 438  “Near fatality”, an act that, as certified by a physician, places a child in serious or critical 
439 condition.  
440  “State team”, the state child fatality review team established in subsection (b).  
441  “Team”, the state or a local team.  
442  “Office”, the office of the child advocate.  
443  (b) There shall be a state child fatality review team within the office. Notwithstanding 
444 section 172 of chapter 6, members of the state team shall be subject to criminal offender record 
445 checks to be conducted by the colonel of state police on behalf of the child advocate. All 
446 members shall serve without compensation for their duties associated with membership on the 
447 state team.  
448  The state team shall consist of not less than: (i) the child advocate, or designee, who shall 
449 serve as co-chair; (ii) the commissioner of public health, or designee, who shall serve as co-
450 chair; (iii) the chief medical examiner, or designee; (iv) the attorney general, or designee; (v) the 
451 commissioner of children and families, or designee; (vi) the commissioner of elementary and 
452 secondary education, or designee; (vii) a representative selected by the Massachusetts District 
453 Attorneys Association; (viii) the colonel of state police, or designee; (ix) the commissioner of 
454 mental health, or designee; (x) the commissioner of developmental services, or designee; (xi) the 
455 director of the Massachusetts Center for Unexpected Infant and Child Death at Boston Medical 
456 Center, or designee; (xii) the commissioner of youth services, or designee; (xiii) the 
457 commissioner of early education and care, or designee; (xiv) a representative selected by the 
458 Massachusetts chapter of the American Academy of Pediatrics who has experience in diagnosing 
459 or treating child abuse and neglect; (xv) a representative selected by the Massachusetts Health 

23 of 41 460 and Hospital Association, Inc.; (xvi) the president of the Massachusetts Chiefs of Police 
461 Association Incorporated, or designee; (xvii) the Department of Children and Families Chapter 
462 President or designee of the certified collective bargaining representative of bargaining unit 8; 
463 and (xviii) any other person, selected by the co-chairs or by majority vote of the members of the 
464 state team, with expertise or information relevant to an individual case. The purpose of the state 
465 team shall be to decrease the incidence of preventable child fatalities and near fatalities by: (1) 
466 developing an understanding of the causes and incidence of child fatalities and near fatalities; 
467 and (2) advising the governor, the general court and the public by recommending changes in law, 
468 policy and practice to prevent child fatalities and near fatalities. The state team may consult with 
469 the chief justice of the juvenile court department of the trial court of the commonwealth on issues 
470 with a direct bearing upon the business of the Massachusetts courts.  
471  To achieve its purpose, the state team shall: (i) develop model investigative and data 
472 collection protocols for local teams; (ii) provide information to local teams and law enforcement 
473 agencies for the purpose of protecting children; (iii) provide training and written materials to 
474 local teams to assist them in carrying out their duties; (iv) review reports from local teams; (v) 
475 study the incidence and causes of child fatalities and near fatalities in the commonwealth; (vi) 
476 analyze community, public and private agency involvement with the children and their families 
477 prior to and subsequent to fatalities or near fatalities; (vii) develop a protocol for the collection of 
478 data regarding fatalities and near fatalities and provide training to local teams on the protocol; 
479 (viii) develop and implement rules and procedures necessary for its own operation; and (ix) 
480 provide the governor, the general court and the public with annual written reports, subject to 
481 confidentiality restrictions, that shall include, but not be limited to, the state team’s findings and 
482 recommendations.  

24 of 41 483  (c) There shall be a local child fatality review team in each district established under 
484 section 13 of chapter 12. Notwithstanding section 172 of chapter 6, members of a local team 
485 shall be subject to criminal offender record checks to be conducted by the district attorney. All 
486 members shall serve without compensation for their duties associated with membership on a 
487 local team.  
488  Each local team shall include, but not be limited to: (i) the district attorney of the county, 
489 who shall serve as chair; (ii) the chief medical examiner or, designee; (iii) the commissioner of 
490 children and families or, designee; (iv) a pediatrician with experience in diagnosing or treating 
491 child abuse and neglect, appointed by the state team; (v) a local police officer from a 
492 municipality where a child fatality or near fatality occurred, appointed by the chief of police of 
493 the municipality; (vi) a state law enforcement officer, appointed by the colonel of state police; 
494 (vii) the director of the Massachusetts Center for Unexpected Infant and Child Death located at 
495 Boston Medical Center or a designee; (viii) at least 1 representative from the department of 
496 public health (ix) at least one representative from the office of the child advocate; (x) a designee 
497 of the collective bargaining representative’s Department of Children and Families Chapter 
498 President who represents the region where the fatality occurred; and (xi) any other person with 
499 expertise or information relevant to an individual case who may attend meetings, on an ad hoc 
500 basis, by agreement of the permanent members of each local team; provided that such person 
501 may include, but shall not be limited to, a local or state law enforcement officer, a hospital 
502 representative, a medical specialist or subspecialist, or a designee of the commissioners of 
503 developmental services, mental health, youth services, education and early education and care.  
504  The purpose of each local team shall be to decrease the incidence of preventable child 
505 fatalities and near fatalities by: (i) coordinating the collection of information on fatalities and 

25 of 41 506 near fatalities; (ii) promoting cooperation and coordination between agencies responding to 
507 fatalities and near fatalities and in providing services to family members; (iii) developing an 
508 understanding of the causes and incidence of child fatalities and near fatalities in the county; and 
509 (iv) advising the state team on changes in law, policy or practice that may affect child fatalities 
510 and near fatalities.  
511  To achieve its purpose, each local team shall: (i) review, establish and implement model 
512 protocols from the state team; (ii) review, subject to the approval of the local district attorney, all 
513 individual fatalities and near fatalities in accordance with the established protocols; (iii) meet 
514 periodically, not less than 2 times per calendar year, to review the status of fatality and near 
515 fatality cases and recommend methods of improving coordination of services between member 
516 agencies; (iv) collect, maintain and provide confidential data as required by the state team; and 
517 (v) provide law enforcement or other agencies with information to protect children.  
518  At the request of the local district attorney, the local team shall be immediately provided 
519 with: (i) information and records relevant to the cause of the fatality or near fatality maintained 
520 by providers of medical or other care, treatment or services, including dental and mental health 
521 care; (ii) information and records relevant to the cause of the fatality or near fatality maintained 
522 by any state, county or local government agency including, but not limited to, birth certificates, 
523 medical examiner investigative data, parole and probation information records and law 
524 enforcement data post-disposition, except that certain law enforcement records may be exempted 
525 by the local district attorney; (iii) information and records of any provider of social services, 
526 including the department of children and families, relevant to the child or the child's family, that 
527 the local team deems relevant to the review; and (iv) demographic information relevant to the 
528 child and the child's immediate family, including, but not limited to, address, age, race, gender 

26 of 41 529 and economic status. The district attorney may enforce this paragraph by seeking an order of the 
530 superior court.  
531  (d) Any privilege or restriction on disclosure established pursuant to chapter 66A, section 
532 70 of chapter 111, section 11 of chapter 111B, section 18 of chapter 111E, chapter 112, chapter 
533 123, section 20B, section 20J or section 20K of chapter 233 or any other law relating to 
534 confidential communications shall not prohibit the disclosure of this information to the chair of 
535 the state team or a local team. Any information considered to be confidential pursuant to the 
536 aforementioned statutes may be submitted for a team’s review upon the determination of that 
537 team’s chair that the review of this information is necessary. The chair shall ensure that no 
538 information submitted for a team’s review is disseminated to parties outside the team. No 
539 member of a team shall violate the confidentiality provisions set forth in the aforementioned 
540 statutes.  
541  Except as necessary to carry out a team’s purpose and duties, members of a team and 
542 persons attending a team meeting shall not disclose any information relating to the team’s 
543 business.  
544  Team meetings shall be closed to the public. Information and records acquired by the 
545 state team or by a local team pursuant to this chapter shall be confidential, exempt from 
546 disclosure under chapter 66 and may only be disclosed as necessary to carry out a team’s duties 
547 and purposes.  
548  Statistical compilations of data that do not contain any information that would permit the 
549 identification of any person may be disclosed to the public.  

27 of 41 550  (e) Members of a team, persons attending a team meeting and persons who present 
551 information to a team shall not be questioned in any civil or criminal proceeding regarding 
552 information presented in or opinions formed as a result of a team meeting.  
553  (f) Information, documents and records of the state team or of a local team shall not be 
554 subject to subpoena, discovery or introduction into evidence in any civil or criminal proceeding; 
555 provided, however, that information, documents and records otherwise available from any other 
556 source shall not be immune from subpoena, discovery or introduction into evidence through 
557 these sources solely because they were presented during proceedings of a team or are maintained 
558 by a team.  
559  (g) Nothing in this section shall limit the powers and duties of the child advocate or 
560 district attorneys.  
561  SECTION 53. Section 2A of chapter 38 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby 
562 repealed.  
563  SECTION 54. Said chapter 18C, as so appearing, is hereby further amended by adding 
564 the following section:-   
565  Section 16. The office shall, every three years, oversee the review of child welfare data 
566 reporting and make recommendations for improvements to the report and profile required under 
567 subsections (b) and (c) of section 26 of chapter 18B and any other legislatively mandated reports, 
568 or the data measures, progress measures, and outcome measures pursuant to section 128 of 
569 chapter 47 of the acts of 2017. Following the release of the department’s annual report, the office 
570 shall seek input from the public, advocates and diverse stakeholders from across the 
571 commonwealth. The office shall consult with other individuals with relevant expertise, including 

28 of 41 572 academics, researchers and service providers. Following such review, the office shall post a 
573 report on its recommendations, together with drafts of any legislation necessary to carry its 
574 recommendations into effect and an aggregate response to the comments raised during the 
575 comment period on the Office of the Child Advocate’s website.    
576  SECTION 55. Chapter 71 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby amended by 
577 inserting the following section:- 
578  Section 100. The department of elementary and secondary education, in consultation with 
579 the department children and families, shall establish and promulgate clear timelines for the 
580 enrollment of a child in the department of children and families’ custody to a new school district, 
581 including but not limited to, the timely transfer of relevant records and documentation. 
582  SECTION 56. Section 21 of chapter 119 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 
583 Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the definition of “Appropriate Services” 
584 the following definition:-  
585  “Benefits”, benefits under Title XVI of the Social Security Act, also referred to as 
586 “Supplemental Security Income” or “SSI”; benefits under Title II of the Social Security Act, also 
587 referred to as “Retirement, Survivors or Disability Insurance Benefits” or “RSDI”; or other 
588 federal benefits. 
589  Section 2. Section 21 of chapter 119, as so appearing, is hereby further amended by 
590 inserting after the definition of “Relative” the following definition:-  
591  “Representative Payee or Fiduciary”, any person or entity designated to receive benefits 
592 for a minor child under the agency rules governing such benefits.  

29 of 41 593  Section 3. Section 23 of chapter 119, as so appearing, is hereby amended by inserting 
594 after subsection (i) the following subsection:-  
595  The department shall comply with section 23D, by providing benefit management 
596 services to children and young adults in the department’s care, custody, or responsibility, 
597 including eligibility screening, representative payee or fiduciary assistance, notice, benefits 
598 accounting, conservation of benefits and other services relative to benefits. 
599  Section 4. Chapter 119 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after section 
600 23C the following section:- 
601  Section 23D. (a) When a child is placed in foster care under a voluntary placement 
602 agreement or court-ordered custody, the department shall make all reasonable efforts to identify 
603 within 60 days of the child being committed to custody of the department whether the child is 
604 already receiving or may be eligible to receive benefits. In reviewing eligibility, the department 
605 shall consult with the parents and others who may have information about the child’s eligibility. 
606 If the department determines, or has cause to believe, that the child may be eligible for benefits, 
607 it shall apply for benefits on the child’s behalf. If the agency administering such benefits denies 
608 the application, the department may appeal the decision. The department shall review cases of 
609 children in foster care annually to determine whether the child may have become eligible for 
610 benefits after the initial assessment. DCF will only seek federal foster care reimbursement for a 
611 child if such reimbursement will not impact the child’s eligibility for benefits or the amount of 
612 benefits.  
613  (b) If the child is already receiving benefits prior to entering department custody, the 
614 department may apply to be the child’s representative payee or fiduciary.  If the department is 

30 of 41 615 applying for benefits for the child, the department may also apply to be the representative payee 
616 or fiduciary. Where the goal is reunification, the department shall consider whether applying to 
617 become the child’s representative payee or fiduciary will undermine the goal of reunification and 
618 be contrary to the child’s best interests.  
619        (c) The department shall provide timely notice for each of the following events: 
620        (i) The department submits an application for benefits; 
621        (ii) The department submits a request to become the child’s representative payee;  
622        (iii) the department receives notice of the agency’s decision regarding benefits 
623 including denial, termination or reduction in benefits; 
624        (iv) the department decides whether or not to appeal an adverse determination, 
625 including the outcome of any appeal filed; and 
626        (v) the department receives notice of an eligibility redetermination. 
627  Notice shall be provided to counsel for the child, as well as counsel for the parent or 
628 parents or legal guardian or guardians, except that no notice shall be provided to a parent for 
629 whom a decree to dispense with consent to adoption has been entered under paragraph 4 of 
630 section 26 of chapter 119. 
631  The notice provisions of this section 23D of chapter 119 of the General Laws shall go 
632 into effect 18 months after the enactment of this act. Until the effective implementation date, the 
633 department shall make best efforts to ensure compliance with the notice requirements of section 
634 23D of chapter 119 of the General Laws. 

31 of 41 635  (d) When the department is the child’s representative payee or fiduciary, it shall maintain 
636 an accounting of the child’s benefits, and shall make available to child’s counsel current 
637 accounting information electronically or by other means. The accounting information shall 
638 include (1) the amount and source of benefits collected by the department and credited to any 
639 account maintained on behalf of the child; (2) the balance of any account maintained on behalf of 
640 the child; (3) any amounts deducted by the department and the reasons for the deductions; and 
641 (4) information regarding all the child’s assets and resources, including benefits, insurance, cash 
642 assets, trust accounts, and earnings if such assets or resources are controlled by the department.  
643 The department shall provide such accounting information to the court at permanency hearings, 
644 at other court proceedings, as necessary, or upon request. 
645  (e) If the department is the child’s representative payee or fiduciary, the Department shall 
646 not use such benefits to reimburse the Commonwealth for the child’s placement in foster care. If 
647 the child is receiving SSI benefits, the department shall ensure that any funds retained on the 
648 child’s behalf are kept in a manner that does not exceed any federal asset or resource limit that 
649 would affect the child’s eligibility to continue receiving SSI benefits. Benefits held by the 
650 department as a representative payee or fiduciary may be spent on the child’s unmet needs, 
651 which would not ordinarily be funded by another source, subject to program rules for the use of 
652 such benefits, or otherwise conserved for the child. Any funds administered for SSI recipients 
653 above the federal asset or resource limits shall be conserved in an Achieving a Better Life 
654 Experience (ABLE) account, authorized by Section 529A of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, 
655 or another account for the child determined not to interfere with federal asset or resource limits 
656 for any other federal means-tested benefit program. If the child is not receiving SSI or other 
657 federal means-tested benefits with an asset or resource limit, the department shall place excess 

32 of 41 658 funds in an interest-bearing account or other savings or investment vehicle for the benefit of the 
659 child. If the department is the child’s representative payee or fiduciary and receives retroactive 
660 benefits for the child, those funds shall be kept as required by the program rules of the agency 
661 administering such benefits.    
662   (f) The department shall take steps to conserve the benefits of children receiving benefits 
663 under this paragraph to assist them in the transition to adulthood and living independently. The 
664 department shall establish accounts as specified in subsection (e) in conserving a child’s benefits.  
665 The department shall work actively with the agency administering such benefits and the child to 
666 ensure that when the child leaves foster care, becomes eligible for direct payment, or another 
667 representative payee is identified, all payments of benefits or conserved funds shall be (1) 
668 returned to the agency following program rules; or (2) upon agreement by the agency, if 
669 necessary, transferred to the child or to a new representative payee or fiduciary.  
670  (g) The department shall provide the child with ongoing financial information regarding 
671 the eligibility for benefits, as well as the existence, amount, availability, use, and limitations of 
672 funds conserved for the child, beginning at 14 years of age and tailored to the individual child. 
673 For youth ages 17 of age or older, financial information shall also include basic assistance with 
674 understanding budgeting and money management, checking and savings accounts, tailored to the 
675 individual child. 
676  (h) The department shall provide the child with ongoing financial literacy training and 
677 support, beginning at 14 years of age and tailored to the individual child. This program may 
678 include, but need not be limited to, topics such as: budgeting; money management; informed 
679 decision-making; banking, checking and savings accounts; credit card counseling; managing 

33 of 41 680 debt; planning for financial security and stability; financing post-secondary education or training; 
681 long term asset-building; and community and agency services. Financial literacy resources 
682 concerning the use of conserved funds shall also be made available to all parents, guardians, and 
683 adoptive parents gaining access to funds conserved by the department. The financial literacy 
684 requirements set forth in M.G.L. c. 119, Sec 23D(h) shall go into effect 18 months after the 
685 enactment of this act. Until the effective implementation date, the department shall make best 
686 efforts to ensure compliance with the financial literacy requirements set forth in this paragraph.     
687  (i) The department shall provide an annual report to the house and senate committees on 
688 ways and means, the committee on children, families and persons with disabilities, the clerks of 
689 the house and the senate and the secretary of the executive office of administration and finance, 
690 not later than December 31; provided, the report shall set forth: (1) the numbers of children in the 
691 department’s care and custody receiving benefits for which the department is the representative 
692 payee or fiduciary; (2) the numbers of children in the department’s care or custody who are 
693 receiving SSI, RSDI or other federal benefits; (3) the amount of benefits being conserved by the 
694 department; and (4) the number and type of accounts established by the department on behalf of 
695 such children. 
696  (j) To the extent such data is available, the report shall also set forth the numbers of 
697 children in the department’s care or custody, (1) who were screened for eligibility for benefits; 
698 and whether such screening occurred within 60 days of being committed to the department’s 
699 custody, and if not, the date of the screening and reasons for the delay; (2) who were already 
700 receiving benefits after screening; and (3) for whom the department submitted applications for 
701 benefits, by type of application, and the outcome of those applications, including the number of 
702 appeals filed; providing however, that if such data is not available, the department shall provide 

34 of 41 703 information to such committees as to its ongoing efforts to be able to gather and report upon such 
704 information. 
705  (k) In administering the benefits of young adults ages 18 to 22 for whom the department 
706 is acting as a representative payee or fiduciary, the department shall comply with the 
707 requirements for children under subsections (a) through (j). The department shall continue to 
708 provide financial literacy training under paragraph (h) to young adults who become eligible for 
709 direct payment of benefits and continue to receive young adult services from the department. 
710  Section 5. Not later than 90 days after the effective date of this act, the secretary of the 
711 executive office of health and human services shall promulgate regulations as necessary to 
712 implement section 23D of chapter 119 of the General Laws, as inserted by this act. The notice 
713 provisions of this section 23D of chapter 119 of the General Laws shall go into effect 18 months 
714 after the enactment of this act. Until the effective implementation date, the department shall 
715 make best efforts to ensure compliance with the notice requirements of section 23D of chapter 
716 119 of the General Laws. The financial literacy requirements set forth in subsection (h) of 
717 section 23D of chapter 119 shall go into effect 18 months after the enactment of this act. Until 
718 the effective implementation date, the department shall make best efforts to ensure compliance 
719 with the financial literacy requirements set forth in said subsection (h). 
720  SECTION 57. Subsection (f) of section 23 of chapter 119 of the General Laws, as 
721 appearing in the 2020 Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out the sixth sentence.  
722  SECTION 58. Subsection (h) of said section 23 of said chapter 119, as so appearing, is 
723 hereby further amended by striking out the second paragraph.  

35 of 41 724  SECTION 59. Subsection (c) of section 26 of said chapter 119, as so appearing, is hereby 
725 amended by inserting after the word “custody”, in line 90, the following words:- “, the child 
726 advocate”.  
727  SECTION 60. Section 29 of chapter 119 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2020 
728 Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the second paragraph the following 
729 paragraphs:  
730  No later than the first business days after, or until the departments attorney portal with 
731 automated notifications is finalized, any non-emergency change in a child’s or a young adult’s 
732 placement or any non-emergency hospitalization, and no later than one business day after any 
733 emergency change in a child’s or a young adult’s placement or any emergency hospitalization, 
734 the department shall provide notice of the change in placement or hospitalization to the child’s or 
735 the young adult’s attorney.  
736  No later than the first business day thereafter, or until the department's attorney portal 
737 with automated notifications is finalized, the department shall provide notice to a child’s attorney 
738 if it receives a report under section 51A and the child is the subject of the report. No later than 
739 the first business day thereafter, the department shall provide notice to a child’s attorney or a 
740 young adult’s attorney if it receives a report under section 51A that raises substantial questions 
741 regarding the suitability of the child’s or young adult’s current placement or any of the child’s or 
742 young adult’s service providers.  
743  No later than three business days thereafter, the department shall provide notice to a 
744 child’s or young adult’s attorney whenever it becomes aware of: (1) the child or young adult 
745 being arrested; (2) the child’s or young adult’s  involvement in any proceeding under this chapter 

36 of 41 746 or any criminal investigation or proceeding; (3) the child or young adult being suspended from 
747 school; or (4) the child or young adult being the subject of any proceeding regarding his or her 
748 suspension or expulsion from school.  
749  SECTION 61. Section 39½ of said chapter 119, as so appearing, is hereby amended by 
750 striking out the eighth paragraph.  
751  SECTION 62. Section 51D of said chapter 119, as so appearing, is hereby amended by 
752 striking out the eighth paragraph.  
753  SECTION 63. Section 51E of said chapter 119, as so appearing, is hereby amended by 
754 striking out, in line 2, the figure “51D” and inserting place thereof the following figure:- “51C”. 
755  SECTION. 64. Chapter 209A of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official 
756 Edition, is hereby amended by adding the following new section: 
757  Section 9A.  Orders Protecting Minors.  Any on behalf of order or order relative to minor 
758 children, remains in effect after the minor reaches the age of majority unless otherwise ordered 
759 by the court. Upon reaching the age of majority, the plaintiff may appear at court on the date and 
760 time the order is to expire, and the court shall determine whether or not to extend the order for 
761 any additional time reasonably necessary to protect the plaintiff or to enter a permanent order. 
762    
763  Chapter 258E of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is hereby 
764 amended by adding the following new section: 
765    

37 of 41 766  Section 11A.  Orders Protecting Minors.  Any order issued on behalf of a minor remains 
767 in effect after the minor reaches the majority unless otherwise ordered by the court. Upon 
768 reaching the age of majority, the plaintiff may appear at court on the date and time the order is to 
769 expire, and the court shall determine whether or not to extend the order for any additional time 
770 reasonably necessary to protect the plaintiff or to enter a permanent order. 
771  SECTION 65. Section 5E of chapter 210 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2020 
772 Official Edition is hereby repealed.  
773  SECTION 66. Item 4800-0015 of section 2 of chapter 28 of the acts of 2023 is hereby 
774 amended by striking out the words “provided further, that on December 1, 2022, and March 1, 
775 2023, the department shall report to the house and senate committees on ways and means and the 
776 joint committee on children, families and persons with disabilities on: (i) the fair hearing 
777 requests filed in fiscal year 2023, using nonidentifying information which shall state, for each 
778 hearing request: (a) the subject matter of the appeal; (b) the number of days between the hearing 
779 request and the first day of the hearing; (c) the number of days between the first day of the 
780 hearing and the hearing officer’s decision; (d) the number of days between the hearing officer’s 
781 decision and the agency’s final decision; (e) the number of days of continuance granted at the 
782 appellant’s request; (f) the number of days of continuance granted at the request of the 
783 department of children and families or the hearing officer’s request, specifying which party made 
784 the request; and (g) whether the department’s decision that was the subject of the appeal was 
785 affirmed or reversed; and (ii) the fair hearing requests filed before fiscal year 2023, which have 
786 been pending for more than 180 days, stating the number of those cases, how many of those 
787 cases have been heard but not decided and how many have been decided by the hearing officer 
788 but not yet issued as a final agency decision; provided further, that the department shall maintain 

38 of 41 789 and make available to the public, during regular business hours, a record of its fair hearings, with 
790 identifying information removed, including for each hearing request: the date of the request, the 
791 date of the hearing decision, the decision rendered by the hearing officer and the final decision 
792 rendered upon the commissioner’s review; provided further, that the department shall make 
793 redacted copies of fair hearing decisions available within 30 days of a written request; provided 
794 further, that the department shall not make available any information in violation of federal 
795 privacy regulations; provided further, that not later than March 1, 2023, the department shall 
796 submit a report to the house and senate committees on ways and means and joint committee on 
797 children, families and persons with disabilities that shall include, but not be limited to, the: (1) 
798 number of medical and psychiatric personnel and their level of training currently employed by or 
799 under contract with the department; (2) number of foster care reviews conducted by the 
800 department and the average length of time in which each review is completed; (3) the number of 
801 social workers and supervisors who have earned a bachelor’s or master’s degree in social work; 
802 (4) the total number of social workers and the total number of social workers holding licensure, 
803 by level; (5) number of the department’s contracts reviewed by the state auditor and the number 
804 of corrective action plans issued; and (6) number of corrective action plans entered into by the 
805 department; provided further, that on the first business day of each quarter, the department shall 
806 file a report with the house and senate committees on ways and means and the joint committee 
807 on children, families and persons with disabilities on the caseload of the department; provided 
808 further, that the report shall include, but not be limited to: (A) the caseloads of residential 
809 placements, congregate care, foster care, therapeutic foster care, adoption, guardianship, 51A 
810 reports, substantiated 51A reports, the number of children who die in the care and custody of the 
811 department, the number of children currently eligible for supportive child care, the number of 

39 of 41 812 children presently receiving supportive child care and the number of medical and psychiatric 
813 consultation requests made by the department’s social workers; (B) the number of approved 
814 foster care placements; (C) the number of children in psychiatric hospitals and community-based 
815 acute treatment programs who remain hospitalized beyond their medically-necessary stay while 
816 awaiting placement and the number of days each case remains in placement beyond that which is 
817 medically necessary; (D) the number of children under the department of children and families’ 
818 care and custody who are being served in medical or psychiatric care provided through other 
819 publicly-funded sources; (E) the number of children served by supervised visitation centers and 
820 the number of those children who are reunified with their families; (F) the total number of 
821 children served, their ages, the number of children served in each service plan, the number of 
822 children in out-of-home placements and the number of placements each child has had before 
823 receiving an out-of-home placement; (G) for each area office, the number of kinship 
824 guardianship subsidies provided in the quarters covered by the report and the number of kinship 
825 guardianship subsidies provided in that quarter for which federal reimbursement was received; 
826 (H) for each area office, the total spending on services other than case management services 
827 provided to families to keep a child with the child’s parents or reunifying the child with the 
828 child’s parents, spending by the type of service including, but not limited to, the number of 
829 children and a breakdown of spending for respite care, intensive in-home services, client 
830 financial assistance and flexible funding, community-based after-school social and recreation 
831 program services, family navigation services and parent aide services and the unduplicated 
832 number of families that receive the services; (I) for each area office, the total number of families 
833 residing in shelters paid for by the department, a list of where the families are sheltered, the total 
834 cost and average cost per family at those shelters and a description of how the department 

40 of 41 835 determines who qualifies or does not qualify for a shelter; (J) for each area office, the number of 
836 requests for voluntary services, broken down by type of service requested, whether the request 
837 was approved or denied, the number of families that were denied voluntary services and received 
838 a 51A report, the reasons for denying the service and what, if any, referrals were made for 
839 services by other agencies or entities; (K) the number of families receiving multiple 51A reports 
840 within a 10-month period, the number of cases reopened within 6 months of being closed and the 
841 number of children who return home and then reenter an out-of-home placement within 6 
842 months; (L) the number of children and families served by the family resource centers by area; 
843 and (M) the number of children within the care and custody of the department whose 
844 whereabouts are unknown; provided further, that not later than January 31, 2023, the department 
845 shall submit a report to the house and senate committees on ways and means and the joint 
846 committee on children, families and persons with disabilities that details any changes to said 
847 rules, regulations or guidelines established by the department in the previous fiscal year to carry 
848 out its duties under chapter 119 of the General Laws including, but not limited to: (I) criteria 
849 used to determine whether a child has been abused or neglected; (II) guidelines for removal of a 
850 child from the home; and (III) standards to determine what reasonable efforts are being made to 
851 keep a child in the home; provided further, that on a monthly basis, the department shall provide 
852 the caseload forecasting office with data on children receiving services and other pertinent data 
853 related to items 4800-0038 and 4800-0041 that is requested by the office; provided further, that 
854 the report shall also contain the number of children and families served by the family resource 
855 centers, by area, and an evaluation of the services provided and their effectiveness.”  
856  SECTION 67. Section 36 shall take effect as of July 1st, 2026.  

41 of 41 857  SECTION 68. The department shall complete the attorney portal referenced in Section 32 
858 within 2 years of this act’s passage.